pt-BR: Boquilha haste/receptor tamanho: Padrão americano; Haste francesa; Haste grossa; Haste fina; Outros
nl: Mondstuk schacht/receiver maat: Amerikaanse standaard; Franse schacht; Grote schacht; Kleine schacht; Overig
cs: Stopka náustku/přijímač velikost: Americký standard; Francouzská stopka; Velká stopka; Malá stopka; Jiné
hu: Fúvókaszár/-tölcsér mérete: Amerikai szabvány; Francia csatlakozás; Nagy csatlakozás; Kis csatlakozás; Egyéb
vi: Kích thước cán/đầu nối ống ngậm: Chuẩn Mỹ; Chuôi kiểu Pháp; Chuôi lớn; Chuôi nhỏ; Khác
it: Gambo del bocchino/ricevitore taglia: Standard americano; Codolo francese; Codolo largo; Codolo stretto; Altro
tr: Ağızlık şaftı/receiver boyutu: Amerikan standardı; Fransız şaftı; Büyük şaft; Küçük şaft; Diğer
sl-SI: Velikost stebla/sprejemnika ustnika: Ameriški standard; Francoski nastavek; Veliki nastavek; Mali nastavek; Drugo
lt-LT: Kandiklio koto / lizdo dydis: Amerikietiškas standartas; Prancūziškas kotelis; Platus kotelis; Siauras kotelis; Kita
pt-PT: tamanho da haste/receptor do bocal: Padrão americano; Haste francesa; Haste grande; Haste pequena; Outro
en: Mouthpiece shank/receiver size: American standard; French shank; Large shank; Small shank; Other
nb: Størrelse på munnstykkeskaft/-feste: Amerikansk standard; Fransk skaft; Stort skaft; Lite skaft; Annet
ro-RO: Dimensiunea muştiucului/receptorului: Standard american; Tub de inserție francez; Tub de inserție mare; Tub de inserție mic; Altele
ja: マウスピースのシャンク／レシーバーサイズ: アメリカンスタンダード; フレンチシャンク; ラージシャンク; スモールシャンク; その他
th: ขนาดก้าน/ตัวรับของปากเป่า: มาตรฐานอเมริกา; เฟรนช์แชงก์; แชงก์ขนาดใหญ่; แชงก์ขนาดเล็ก; อื่นๆ
sv: Munstyckesskaft/mottagarstorlek: Amerikansk standard; Fransk fattning; Stor fattning; Liten fattning; Övrigt
es: Tamaño del vástago/receptor de la boquilla: Estándar americano; Tudel francés; Tudel grande; Tudel pequeño; Otro
hr-HR: Veličina drške usnika/prijemnika: Američki standard; Francuski vrat; Veliki vrat; Mali vrat; Ostalo
fi: Suukappaleen varren tai vastakappaleen koko: Amerikkalainen standardi; Ranskalainen varsi; Leveä varsi; Kapea varsi; Muu
ru: Размер ножки и приемника мундштука: Американский стандарт; Французская ножка; Большой хвостовик; Малый хвостовик; Другое
zh-TW: 號嘴柄管/承接口尺寸: 美國標準; 法式接管; 大接管; 小接管; 其他
el: Μέγεθος ακροφυσίου/δέκτη: Αμερικανικό πρότυπο; Γαλλικό επιστόμιο (shank); Μεγάλο επιστόμιο (shank); Μικρό επιστόμιο (shank); Άλλο
zh-CN: 吹嘴柄/接收器尺寸: 美标; 法式柄; 大柄; 小柄; 其他
bg-BG: Размер на шийката/приемника на мундщука: Американски стандарт; Френски шанк; Голям шанк; Малък шанк; Друго
fr: Taille de la tige ou du récepteur de l’embouchure: Standard américain; Perce française; Perce large; Perce étroite; Autre
de: Größe von Mundstückschaft/-aufnahme: American Standard; Französischer Schaft; Großer Schaft; Kleiner Schaft; Sonstige
sk-SK: Veľkosť drieku náustku/prijímača: Americký štandard; Francúzska stopka; Široká stopka; Úzka stopka; Iné
ko: 마우스피스 섕크/리시버 크기: 미국식(표준); 프렌치 섕크; 라지 섕크; 스몰 섕크; 기타
da: Størrelse af skaft/indstik for mundstykke: Amerikansk standard; Fransk skaft; Stort skaft; Lille skaft; Andet
pl: Trzpień ustnika/rozmiar korpusu: Standard amerykański; Chwyt francuski; Duży chwyt; Mały chwyt; Inne